West Virginia, session 2026, SB25.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 17A. MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION, REGISTRATION, CERTIFICATE OF TITLE, AND ANTITHEFT PROVISIONS. ARTICLE 3. ORIGINAL AND RENEWAL OF REGISTRATION; ISSUANCE OF CERTIFICATES OF TITLE. §17A-3-28. Friends of Coal registration fee. The Commissioner shall transfer to the West Virginia Coal Marketing Program Fund created in §22-37-2 of this code any registration fees collected pursuant to section §17A-3-14 of this article for an initial or renewal registration plate bearing the words “Friends of Coal”. The Commission may deduct from the transfer the actual cost of producing the registration plates and shall transfer the fees on a quarterly basis. CHAPTER 22. ENVIRONMENTAL RESOURCES Article 37. West Virginia Coal Marketing Program. §22-37-1. West Virginia Coal Marketing Program created. (a) The West Virginia Coal Marketing Program is created in the Office of the Governor.(b) The purposes of the program are to:(1) Protect and expand the state’s coal markets and coal facilities; and (2) Address the impacts that cities, towns, and counties have experienced or will experience due to changes in the coal market. §22-37-2. West Virginia Coal Marketing Program Fund. (a) The West Virginia Coal Marketing Program Fund is created in the state treasury and administered by the Governor.  (b) The Governor shall expend moneys in the fund, including earned interest, on projects that satisfy the purposes of this article and have a public benefit that:(1) Is associated with expanding and protecting the state’s coal markets and coal facilities; (2) Addresses impacts that cities, towns, and counties have experienced or will experience due to changes in the coal market; and(3) Promotes and educates the citizenry on the state’s coal market and industry, which may include but is not limited to such areas as:(A) Coal’s central role in the state’s identity;(B) The value of coal industry to the state’s economy;(C) The realities of modern coal mining compared to historic coal mining;(D) Energy reliability and grid stability;(E) The economic challenge facing coal communities; and(F) Coal’s future in West Virginia.(c) The Governor may accept and shall deposit into the fund any gifts, contributions, donations, grants, or federal funds designated for the benefit of the West Virginia Coal Marketing Program or any project funded under the program.(d) The Governor shall expend for the promotional and educational purposes specified in subdivision §22-37-3(b)(3) of this section any moneys received in the fund from the Friends of Coal registration plate fees pursuant to §17A-3-28 of this code.(e) Any unexpended balances remaining in the fund at the close of a fiscal year do not expire and shall be reappropriated to the fund for the subsequent fiscal year. §22-37-3. Rules. The Governor shall promulgate rules as necessary to implement the provisions of this article in accordance with the provisions of §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code. §22-37-4. Report. Annually, on or before October 1, the Governor shall report to the Joint Committee on Government and Finance on the projects funded by the West Virginia Coal Marketing Program. For each project awarded funds, the report shall include the recipient, the amount of funds awarded, and a description of the project. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home